Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4072.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 17773. (1) Any unused portion of a facility-provided drug that is dispensed for an ophthalmic surgical procedure performed on or for ophthalmic medical care provided to a patient in a hospital or freestanding surgical outpatient facility licensed under article 17 must be offered to the patient on the patientâs discharge from the hospital or freestanding surgical outpatient facility if all of the following apply: (a) The hospital or freestanding surgical outpatient facility orders the facility-provided drug for an ophthalmic surgical procedure for the patient that is performed on an in-patient basis or for ophthalmic medical care that the patient receives from the hospital or freestanding surgical outpatient facility on an in-patient basis. (b) The facility-provided drug is administered to the patient at the hospital or freestanding surgical outpatient facility. (c) The unused portion of the facility-provided drug is required for the patientâs continued treatment. (2) If a pharmacist, rather than a dispensing prescriber, dispenses a facility-provided drug that is offered to a patient under subsection (1), the pharmacist shall ensure that the drug is provided to the patient in a container that is labeled in the same manner as required in section 17745(7) for a drug dispensed by a dispensing prescriber. (3) The prescriber of the facility-provided drug shall counsel the patient on the directions for the patientâs use of the facility-provided drug. If a pharmacist dispenses the facility-provided drug, any counseling requirement on the pharmacist is waived. (4) As used in this section, âfacility-provided drugâ means a drug that meets both of the following requirements: (a) The drug is an eye drop or eye ointment. (b) The drug is not a pharmaceutical compounded under section 17748b. Sec. 20817. A freestanding surgical outpatient facility shall comply with section 17773. Sec. 21539. A hospital shall comply with section 17773. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor